Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5664.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Electric bicycle” the
following definition:-
“Electric moped”, a pedal bicycle that has a helper motor, or a non-pedal bicycle that has
a motor, with an electric motor of no more than 2 horsepower or 1500 watts, an automatic
transmission and that is capable of a maximum speed of no more than 30 miles per hour.
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the definition of “Motorized bicycle” and inserting the following
definition:-
“Motorized bicycle”, (i) a pedal bicycle which has a helper motor, or a non-pedal bicycle
which has a motor, with a cylinder capacity not exceeding 50 cubic centimeters, an automatic
transmission and which is capable of a maximum speed of no more than 30 miles per hour; or (ii)
of 2

an electric moped; provided, that the definition of ''motorized bicycle'' shall not include an
electric bicycle.
of 2